Hawaii statutes.
[§468L-5.5] Recordkeeping requirements for
client trust accounts. (a) A travel agency or charter tour operator shall
maintain all books and records necessary to comply with this chapter and its
rules.

(b) A
travel agency or charter tour operator shall keep and maintain for a period of
at least two years copies of all bank statements, deposit slips, canceled
checks, drafts, and wire or electronic transaction documents relating to client
trust accounts. The travel agency, charter tour operator, or any branch
offices shall make such records available for inspection and audit within three
business days of a written request by the director. Nothing herein shall
prevent the director from inspecting and auditing the books and records of the
travel agency, charter tour operator, or any branch offices, as otherwise
provided under this chapter or its rules. [L 2001, c 62, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next